Utah statutes.
53A-13-209.    Programs authorized -- Minimum standards.

(1)  Local school districts may:

(a)  allow students to complete the classroom training portion of driver education through the following programs:

(i)  home study; or

(ii)  the electronic high school;

(b)  provide each parent with driver education instructional materials to assist in parent involvement with driver education including behind-the-wheel driving materials;

(c)  offer driver education outside of school hours in order to reduce the cost of providing driver education;

(d)  offer driver education through community education programs;

(e)  offer the classroom portion of driver education in the public schools and allow the student to complete the behind-the-wheel portion with a private provider:

(i)  licensed under Section 53-3-504; and

(ii)  not associated with the school or under contract with the school under Subsection 53A-13-202(3); or

(f)  any combination of Subsections (1)(a) through (e).

(2)  In accordance with Title 63G, Chapter 3, Utah Administrative Rulemaking Act, the State Board of Education shall establish minimum standards for the school-related programs under Subsection (1).

